Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 5 Revocation and Republication

53-4-40.
Power of testator.

A will may be changed or revoked by the testator at any time prior to the testator’s death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing types of unintended revocation in Georgia, see 14 Ga. B.J. 281 (1952).

For article analyzing the Georgia law relating to revocation and republication of wills, comparing it with the laws of other states, and suggesting some changes, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

53-4-41.
Intent.

In all cases of revocation, the intent to revoke is necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-42.
Express or implied revocation.

A revocation may be express or implied.

An express revocation occurs when the testator by writing or action expressly annuls a will. An express revocation takes effect instantly.

An implied revocation results from the execution of a subsequent inconsistent will that does not by its terms expressly revoke the previous will. An implied revocation takes effect only when the subsequent inconsistent will becomes effective. If the subsequent inconsistent will fails to become effective from any cause, the implied revocation is not completed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-43.
Subsequent will or other written instrument.

An express revocation may be effected by a subsequent will or other written instrument that is executed, subscribed, and attested with the same formality as required for a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-44.
Destruction or obliteration of will or material portion thereof.

An express revocation may be effected by any destruction or obliteration of the will done by the testator with an intent to revoke or by another at the testator’s direction. The intent to revoke shall be presumed from the obliteration or cancellation of a material portion of the will, but such presumption may be overcome by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 15.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia wills, trusts, and administration of estates law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 307 (1981).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

53-4-45.
Revival or republication of previous will.

If a will or other written instrument that expressly revoked a previous will in its entirety is revoked by a later will or other written instrument, as described in Code Section 53-4-43, the previous will remains revoked unless it is revived. The previous will is revived if it appears from the terms of the later will or other written instrument that the testator intended the previous will to take effect.

If a will or other written instrument that expressly revoked a previous will in its entirety is revoked by an act, as described in Code Section 53-4-44, the previous will remains revoked unless it is revived. The previous will is revived if it appears from the circumstances of the revocation of the will or other written instrument or from the testator’s contemporaneous or subsequent declarations that the testator intended the previous will to take effect.

If a will or other written instrument that expressly revoked or amended a previous will in part is revoked by a later will or other written instrument, as described in Code Section 53-4-43, the revoked or amended part of the previous will is revived to the extent it appears from the terms of the later will or other written instrument that the testator intended the previous will to take effect.

If a will or other written instrument that expressly revoked or amended a previous will in part is revoked by an act, as described in Code Section 53-4-44, the revoked or amended part of the previous will is revived unless it is evident from the circumstances of the revocation of the will or other written instrument or from the testator’s contemporaneous or subsequent declarations that the testator did not intend the revoked or amended part of the previous will to take effect as executed.

If a will or other written instrument that expressly revoked a previous will in whole or in part is revoked by a later will or other written instrument, as described in Code Section 53-4-43, or by an act, as described in Code Section 53-4-44, and the previous will or any revoked or amended portion is not revived in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, the previous will may be republished in whole or in part in accordance with Code Section 53-4-50.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “Code Section” was substituted for “Code” in subsections (c) and (d).

53-4-46.
Presumption of intent.

A presumption of intent to revoke arises if the original of a testator’s will cannot be found to probate.

A copy of a will may be offered for probate in accordance with Chapter 5 of this title in lieu of the original will if the original cannot be found to probate, provided that the copy is proved by a preponderance of the evidence to be a true copy of the original will and that the presumption of intent to revoke set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section is rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 16.

Law reviews.

For article advocating repeal or amendment of this Code section, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

53-4-47.
Effect of implied revocation.

An implied revocation extends only so far as an inconsistency exists between testamentary instruments. Any portion of a prior instrument that can stand consistently with the testamentary scheme in a subsequent instrument shall remain unrevoked.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-4-48.
Effect of testator’s marriage, or birth or adoption of child; provision in will for class of children.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-4-49, the marriage of the testator, the birth of a child to the testator, including a posthumous child born within ten months of the testator’s death, or the adoption of a child by the testator subsequent to the making of a will in which no provision is made in contemplation of such event shall result in a revocation of the will only to the extent provided in the remainder of this Code section.

A provision in a will for a class of the testator’s children shall be presumed to be made in contemplation of the birth or adoption of additional members of that class, absent an indication of a contrary intent, and the mere identification in the will of children already born or adopted at the time of the execution of the will shall not defeat this presumption.

If the will was made prior to an event specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, and does not contain a provision in contemplation of such an event, the subsequent spouse or child shall receive the share of the estate he or she would have received if the testator had died intestate. Such share shall be paid from the net residuum remaining after all debts and expenses of administration, including taxes, have been paid. If the residuum proves to be insufficient, then testamentary gifts shall abate in the manner provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 53-4-63. Any bequest in the will in favor of the subsequent spouse or child shall be given effect and shall count toward the intestate share. If the bequest equals or exceeds the intestate share, then the subsequent spouse or child shall receive the bequest in lieu of the intestate share provided by this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “subsection (b)” was substituted for “paragraph (b)” in the third sentence in subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For comment on Thornton v. Anderson,

207 Ga. 714

,

64 S.E.2d 186

(1951), see
3 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1951);
14 Ga. B.J. 86 (1951).

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Problems Under Georgia’s Lapse Statutes,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 268 (1972).

For note, “Advantages and Disadvantages of Intestate Death for Married Persons with an Estate of $120,000 or Less,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1972).

For article discussing the pretermitted heir, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For article criticizing former Code 1933, § 113-408 as too drastic, and suggesting revisions, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (2016).

53-4-49.
Effect of testator’s divorce, annulment, or remarriage to former spouse.

All provisions of a will made prior to a testator’s final divorce or the annulment of the testator’s marriage in which no provision is made in contemplation of such event shall take effect as if the former spouse had predeceased the testator, and the provisions of Code Section 53-4-64 shall not apply with respect to the descendants of the former spouse who are not also descendants of the testator. If the testator remarries the former spouse and the testator has not revoked or amended the will that was made prior to the divorce or annulment, the remarriage shall not result in the revocation of the will and the provisions of the will that were revoked solely due to the application of this Code section shall be revived.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on Thornton v. Anderson,

207 Ga. 714

,

64 S.E.2d 186

(1951), see
3 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (1951);
14 Ga. B.J. 86 (1951).

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Problems Under Georgia’s Lapse Statutes,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 268 (1972).

For note, “Advantages and Disadvantages of Intestate Death for Married Persons with an Estate of $120,000 or Less,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1972).

For article discussing the pretermitted heir, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For article criticizing former Code 1933, § 113-408 as too drastic, and suggesting revisions, see 11 Ga. L. Rev. 297 (1977).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

53-4-50.
Republication of revoked will.

A revoked will may be republished by a writing executed by the testator and subscribed and attested by witnesses with the same formality required for a will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-4-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).